California, session 20252026, AB2743.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 63907 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, immediately following Section 63906, to read:63907. (a) The department may establish a task force, comprising of members who currently serve on a marketing advisory and promotional council or commission established in Division 22 (commencing with Section 63901) of the Food and Agricultural Code and are appointed by the secretary, for the purpose of providing the secretary with recommendations regarding how to best use available resources of the Buy California Program, established pursuant to Section 58750, to capitalize on marketing possibilities for California agricultural products during a single, specific, and identifiable event drawing significant world attention.(b) For purposes of this section, “event drawing significant world attention” means an event scheduled to occur within California, organized by, or with the cooperation of, one or more individuals or organizations based outside of the United States, that is reasonably expected to be broadcast live, or by recording, to multiple countries outside the United States. An “event drawing significant world attention” may include, but not be limited to, a sporting event, musical performance, or other entertainment event.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation to support California agriculture through the California Grown Program.